District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0592.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
be cited as the “Lottery Preference for Families Impacted by School Closures
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The District of Columbia School Reform Act of 1995, approved April 26, 1996
(110 Stat. 1321; D.C. Official Code, § 38-18.06(c), is amended to read as follows:
“(c) Random selection. — If there are more applications to enroll in a public charter
school from students who are residents of the District of Columbia than there are spaces
available, students shall be admitted using a random selection process, with the following
exceptions:
“(1) A preference in admission may be given to an applicant who is a:
“(A) Sibling or child of a student already attending or selected for
admission to the public charter school in which the applicant is seeking enrollment;
“(B) Child of a member of the public charter school’s founding board;
provided, that enrollment of such children is limited to no more than 10% of the school’s total

enrollment or to 20 students, whichever is less; and
“(C) Child of a full-time employee of the public charter school who is a District
resident; provided, that enrollment of such children is limited to no more than 10% of the
school’s total enrollment.
“(2) A preference in admission shall be given to an applicant who, during the
current or immediately preceding school year, attended a Closed School.
“(A) For the purposes of this subsection, a Closed School means,
“(i) A school authorized by the PCSB that a student attended
during the current or immediately preceding school year and that, prior to the opening of the
enrollment period in the common lottery for admissions to public schools pursuant to § 38-194,
has had its charter revoked pursuant to § 38-1802.13, has not had its charter renewed pursuant to
§ 38-1802.12, has voluntarily relinquished its charter, or has provided governing board
notification to the PCSB of its intent to close.
“(ii) A District of Columbia Public School that a student attended
during the current or immediately preceding school year and that, prior to the opening of the
common lottery enrollment period established pursuant to § 38-194, was determined
consolidated or closed by District of Columbia Public Schools.
“(B) In the event that a school permanently ceases operations after the
conclusion of the Common Lottery as a result of voluntary charter relinquishment, emergency
revocation, or other closure recognized by the PCSB or DCPS, a student who was enrolled in the
school at the time it ceased operations shall remain eligible for the closed school admission
preference for the school year immediately following the school year in which the school ceased
operations.”


Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.